Washington statutes.
RCW 8.26.095

Contracts for services—Use of services of other agencies.

In order to prevent unnecessary expenses and duplication of functions, and to promote uniform and effective administration of relocation assistance programs for displaced persons, a state agency or local public agency may enter into contracts with any individual, firm, association, or corporation for services in connection with this chapter or may carry out its functions under this chapter through any federal or state agency or local public agency having an established organization for conducting relocation assistance programs. The state agency or local public agency shall, in carrying out relocation activities described in RCW 8.26.075, whenever practicable, use the services of state or local housing agencies, or other agencies having experience in the administration or conduct of similar housing assistance activities.

[ 1988 c 90 s 9.]

NOTES:

Section captions—1988 c 90: See note following RCW 8.26.010.